Utah, session 2026, SB50.
Section 1. Section 31A-22-663 is enacted to read:31A-22-663. Anesthesia services.(1)A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for medically necessary anesthesia services, regardless of the duration, for any procedure covered by the health benefit plan.(2)A health benefit plan is prohibited from denying payment or reimbursement for anesthesia services solely because the duration of care exceeded a preset time limit.(3)This section applies to a health benefit plan contract entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.